Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 10. Conservation and Development

Executive Order No. 10-1
(No. 25-70) [Environmental Conservation Agency.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-46 (codified as Executive Order 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 10-2
(No. 26-70) [Transfer of Functions Relating to Water Pollution, Air Pollution, Radiation Pollution, Waste Disposal and Granting of Permits to Environmental Conservation Agency.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-46 (codified as Executive Order 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 10-3
(No. 29-71) [Transfer of Tourist Information and Outdoor Advertising Functions to Agency of Development and Community Affairs.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-46 (codified as Executive Order 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 10-4
(No. 34-71) [Transfer of Positions and Funds to Agency of Development and Community Affairs.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-46 (codified as Executive Order 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 10-5
(No. 43-71) [Transfer of Functions Relating to Industrial Hygiene and Ionizing Radiation to Department of Health.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-46 (codified as Executive Order 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 10-6
(No. 10a-77) [Transfer of Duties and Functions of Division of Outdoor Advertising.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-46 (codified as Executive Order 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 10-7
(No. 61-81) [Transfer of Division of Protection, Agency of Environmental Conservation, to Department of Water Resources and Environmental Engineering.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-46 (codified as Executive Order 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 10-8
(No. 24-86) [Program for Recycling of Waste Products and Revision of State Solid Waste Management Plan.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 10-9
(No. 53-87) [Designation of University of Vermont as Leading Institution for Providing Research and Development Services to Business Community.

WHEREAS, the delivery of applied research and development services to the business community by post secondary institutions will enhance Vermont’s business climate; and

WHEREAS, the University of Vermont is the only institution in Vermont with the “critical mass” to assist economic development activities effectively through basic research and applied research and development; and

WHEREAS, the University of Vermont has shown initiative in launching several major activities to respond to the research and development needs of the business community; and

WHEREAS, the University has demonstrated its research ability in the liberal arts and sciences; in agriculture, life sciences and natural resources; in education and social services; in engineering, math and business administration; and in medicine, nursing
and allied health sciences,

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Madeleine M. Kunin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby direct that the University of Vermont be designated the lead research institution facilitating a consortium of other state-supported
and independent colleges and universities to provide a comprehensive system of research and development services.

Dated December 8, 1987.

Executive Order No. 10-10
(No. 68-88) [State Agencies Designated as Having Programs Affecting Land Use or Exempted From Compliance With All Provisions of Growth Management Act of 1988 (Act 200); Establishment of and Reports to State Agency Planning Implementation Committee.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-50 (codified as Executive Order 10-09), dated December 23, 2009.

Executive Order No. 10-11
(No. 71-89) [Transfer of Authority to Administer Solid Waste Grant Programs From Secretary of Development and Community Affairs to Secretary of Natural Resources.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-46 (codified as Executive Order 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 10-12
(No. 84-90) [Designation of Department of Environmental Conservation and Department of Housing and Community Affairs as Agencies To Administer 10 V.S.A. Chapter 153.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order 3-46 (codified as Executive Order No. 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 10-13
(No. 92-90) [Energy Emergency Plan.

WHEREAS, a shortage of energy resources within the state of Vermont may occur at any time and such a shortage may cause severe economic hardships or constitute a serious threat to public health, safety, and welfare;

WHEREAS, under Act 254 of the 1973 Adjourned Session, as amended, the Governor is authorized to declare that an energy emergency exists and take actions to mitigate the effects of that emergency; and

WHEREAS, it is prudent to have in place guidelines which inform the public of potential actions and allow for a rapid and coordinated response in the event an energy emergency occurs.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED that I, Madeleine M. Kunin, Governor of the state of Vermont, do hereby order as follows:

The Energy Emergency Plan is adopted. The Energy Emergency Plan shall be available for public comment.

The Energy Emergency Plan shall be revised from time to time by the Governor. The Commissioner of the Department of Public Service shall recommend amendments as necessary to reflect changed conditions and comments from the public.

The Department of Public Service shall retain an updated copy of the plan to be implemented in the event the Governor declares an energy emergency.

This executive order takes effect upon signing.

Dated August 31, 1990.

Executive Order No. 10-14
(No. 99-90) [Approval of Interim State Agency Land Use Plans.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-50 (codified as Executive Order 10-09), dated December 23, 2009.

Executive Order No. 10-15
(No. 10-91) [Advisory Council to the Agency of Development and Community Affairs.

Superseded by Executive Order 3-99 (codified as Executive Order No. 10-21), dated April 8, 1999.

Executive Order No. 10-16
(No. 13-91) [State Agencies Designated as Having Programs Affecting Land Use in Compliance with Provisions of Growth Management Act of
1988 (Act 200); Establishment of and Reports to State Agency Implementation Committee.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-50 (codified as Executive Order 10-09), dated December 23, 2009.

Executive Order No. 10-17
(No. 05-92) [Governor’s Council of Environmental Advisors.

Rescinded by Executive Order No. 10-37 (codified as Executive Order 01-11), dated March 30, 2011.

Executive Order No. 10-18
(No. 06-94) [Vermont Clean State Program.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 10-31 (codified as Executive Order No. 02-04), dated April 8, 2004.

Executive Order No. 10-19
(No. 14-94) [Termination of Vermont Technology Council: Science and Technology Plan.

WHEREAS, the Vermont Technology Council was requested to propose a vision and fundamental plan for science and technology in Vermont pursuant to Executive Order No. 14-93, signed November 18, 1993; and

WHEREAS, the Council has devoted many hours and significant resources to development of this plan and has completed its work; and

WHEREAS, the purpose of Executive Order No. 14-93 has been achieved.

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, Howard Dean, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, wish to thank the members of the Vermont Technology Council and especially its Chair for the work done at my request; and

BE IT FURTHER RESOLVED that Executive Order No. 14-93, its purpose having been accomplished, is hereby rescinded.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall rescind Executive Order No. 14-93.

Dated December 16, 1994.

Executive Order No. 10-20
(No. 14-96) [Designation of Vermont Housing and Conservation Board as the “State Trust Fund”.

WHEREAS, the General Assembly created the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board to conserve and protect Vermont’s agricultural land and to date the Board has assisted in the protection of 53,500 acres of agricultural land through the purchase of development
rights; and

WHEREAS, the Farms for the Future Act, passed by the United States Congress in 1990, established the Agricultural Resource Conservation Demonstration Program (the “Program”) by which the State of Vermont is eligible for federal assistance for up to five
years to acquire interests in land to protect and preserve important farmland for future agricultural use; and

WHEREAS, under the Program, the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Agriculture (the “Secretary”), acting through the Farmers Home Administration, will guarantee ten year loans from lending institutions, pay all interest on such loans for the first five
years and pay the difference between the charged interest rate and the limited resource rate, not less than 3 percent for the second five years; and

WHEREAS, by participating in the Program, the State of Vermont will increase its ability to acquire interests in land to protect and preserve important farmland and create a self-sustaining fund administered by the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board
which will reduce the risk of losing important farmland; and

WHEREAS, in order to qualify for federal assistance this year, the State must (i) demonstrate that State/private assistance is available for acquiring interests in land to protect and preserve important farmlands for future agricultural use; (ii) designate
a State trust fund; and (iii) negotiate and sign an Agreement with the Secretary; and

WHEREAS, implementation of the federal Program will require a concerted and coordinated effort by State and local governments, private nonprofit corporations, lending institutions and the Secretary;

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, Howard Dean, M.D., Governor of the State of Vermont, by the power vested in me by 3 V.S.A. Chapter 41, do hereby designate the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board (the “Board”) as the “State trust fund” for purposes
of the Agricultural Resource Conservation Demonstration Program, passed by the United States Congress in 1990 (the “Program”).

The Board is authorized to negotiate and sign an Agreement with the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Agriculture (the “Secretary”), so that the State of Vermont will receive federal assistance under the Program which will be used exclusively to implement
and effectuate the policies and purposes of the Vermont Housing and Conservation Trust Fund Act, Title 10, Chapter 15 (

1987, No. 88
, § 1, eff. June 11, 1987) to facilitate the acquisition of interests in land to protect and preserve important farmlands for future agricultural use in the State of Vermont;

The Board shall advise the Secretary of the amount of State/private assistance Vermont will make available for acquiring interests in land to protect and preserve important farmlands for future agricultural use and provide the Secretary with necessary
verification;

Once the Secretary notifies the State of Vermont that it is eligible to receive federal assistance under the Program, the Board is authorized to borrow funds from a lending institution, provided that the loan is guaranteed by the Secretary and that the
loan proceeds are used exclusively to implement and effectuate the policies and purposes of the Vermont Housing and Conservation Trust Fund Act;

During Vermont’s participation in the Program, the Board shall work with the General Assembly, the State Treasurer, municipalities, foundations, nonprofit corporations, businesses and private parties to set the amount of assistance the State of Vermont
will make available in State/private assistance for acquiring interests in land to protect and preserve important farmlands for future agricultural use so that the State of Vermont will continue to be eligible for federal assistance
under the Program;

As part of its annual report to the Governor and the General Assembly, the Board shall include a full financial report of funds received under the Program and a list and a description of activities supported with such funds.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall supersede Executive Order #98-90 adopted December 20, 1990.

Dated September 10, 1996.

Executive Order No. 10-21
(No. 03-99) [Establishment of Advisory Council to the Agency of Commerce and Community Development.

Expired by its own terms, effective May 1, 2005.

Executive Order No. 10-22
(No. 04-99) [State Compliance with Environmental Laws.

Expired by its own terms, effective January 1, 2005.

Executive Order No. 10-23
(No. 02-00) [Vermont’s Committee to Ensure Clean Air.

Expired by its own terms, effective June 30, 2001.

Executive Order No. 10-24
(No. 03-00) [Membership Expansion of Vermonter’s Committee to Ensure Clean Air.

Expired by its own terms, effective June 30, 2001.

Executive Order No. 10-25
(No. 08-00) [Vermont’s Committee to Ensure Clean Air.

Expired by its own terms, effective June 30, 2001.

Executive Order No. 10-26
(No. 03-02) [Reduction of Mercury Use.

WHEREAS, mercury is a persistent and toxic pollutant that has accumulated in Vermont’s environment, especially in aquatic environments; and

WHEREAS, most of Vermont’s mercury contamination comes from large generators of air pollution located in upwind regions of the country; and

WHEREAS, this pollution is harmful to health and the environment; and

WHEREAS, consumption of certain fresh and salt water fish above the state’s fish consumption advisory levels may pose a health risk, especially to young children and women of child bearing age because of mercury pollution; and

WHEREAS, Vermont’s fish-consuming wildlife are also threatened from mercury contamination; and

WHEREAS, approximately one third of Vermont’s impaired waters are impaired because of air deposition of mercury; and

WHEREAS, Vermont and other New England States and the Eastern Canadian Provinces support the virtual elimination of mercury from the environment; and

WHEREAS, Vermont and other New England States agreed to approaches to obtain reduction of air deposition of mercury, including litigation against sources of that pollution; and

WHEREAS, one additional source of mercury contamination in the environment is the release of mercury from numerous types of consumer products including thermometers, lamps, thermostats, medical instruments, and numerous products containing mercury switches
(such as autos, pumps and gauges) when they are disposed of or broken; and

WHEREAS, mercury-free or low mercury alternative products exist for many consumer products containing mercury; and

WHEREAS, Vermont must do its part to remove mercury from the environment; and

WHEREAS, Vermont has implemented mercury education and reduction programs and a precedent setting mercury product labeling law to alert consumers of mercury content; and

WHEREAS, Vermont state government has a duty and responsibility to lead by example in conserving natural resources and practicing pollution prevention, and has taken numerous actions through the Vermont Clean State Program to reduce wasteful practices
and reduce toxic chemical use and release.

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, HOWARD DEAN, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby order state agencies, departments and offices.

To eliminate the purchase of products that contain mercury where mercury-free alternatives exist at reasonable cost and comparable performance to mercury-added products.

Where such mercury-free alternative products do not exist, I order that preference be given to the purchase of products with the lowest total mercury content feasible (and documented as such) and products that bear a mercury content warning label as required
of product manufacturers under Vermont law.

These practices shall be reflected in the administrative purchasing policies of the state no later than July 1, 2002 and in all new contracts issued after the effective date of this order.

The Department of Environmental Conservation shall assist the Department of Buildings and General Services in identifying mercury-added products and low and mercury-free product alternatives.

The Department of Environmental Conservation and the Department of Buildings shall jointly report to the Secretary of the Agency of Administration annually regarding compliance with this Executive Order.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall sunset on June 30, 2012.

Dated April 4, 2002.

Executive Order No. 10-27
(No. 07-02) [Establishment of On-Site Septic Reform Education and Implementation Advisory Committee.

Expired by its own terms, effective January 1, 2003.

Executive Order No. 10-28
(No. 11-02) [Reduction in Greenhouse Gas Emissions from State Government Buildings and Operations.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 14-03 (codified as Executive Order No. 10-30), dated September 16, 2003.

Executive Order No. 10-29
(No. 12-02) [West Mountain Wildlife Management Area.

WHEREAS, in 1999, pursuant to Sec. 87a of No. 1 of the Acts of 1999, the State of Vermont participated in the purchase of approximately 133,000 acres of land in Vermont’s Northeast Kingdom; and

WHEREAS, the appropriation of $4,500,000 was to be “used to purchase and ensure that the lands commonly referred to as the Champion lands in northeastern Vermont are conserved as a working forest for the sustainable production of wood products, for natural
resources, including the maintenance of wildlife habitat and conservation of identified natural heritage sites, and for perpetual public access for traditional recreational uses”; and

WHEREAS, the former Champion lands now consist of approximately 84,000 acres of working forest, subject to both a working forest and a public access easement owned by the State of Vermont and the Vermont Land Trust to ensure that the land is perpetually
managed for the sustainable growth and harvesting of timber and is perpetually open for public access; approximately 22,500 acres of state-owned land, the West Mountain Wildlife Management Area, conserved for perpetual public access
and its fish, wildlife and ecological values; as well as approximately 26,500 acres of land held by the United States Fish and Wildlife Service as a Silvio Conti National Fish & Wildlife Refuge; and

WHEREAS, this land purchase, in which Vermont’s contribution equaled less than a fifth of the total purchase price, has guaranteed Vermonters’ access to these lands forever; and

WHEREAS, dialogue and clear assurances will allow us to move forward to ensure that the complex land deal that granted Vermonters so much is appreciated by Vermonters for its value and is protected forever.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Howard Dean, M.D., through the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby order as follows:

The West Mountain Wildlife Management Area (WMWMA) that was acquired by the state of Vermont as part of the so-called Champion land deal pursuant to Sec. 87a of No. 1 of the Acts of 1999, and that is a portion of the so-called Champion lands, is a wildlife
management area, and as such it will be managed by the Vermont Department of Fish and Wildlife or its successor agency or department.

All of the approximately 22,500 acres of the WMWMA shall be conserved for lawful and perpetual public access for traditional recreational uses, including boating, fishing, trapping, snowshoeing, skiing, bird watching, hiking, and hunting (including training
and using hunting dogs). The Department of Fish and Wildlife shall allow snowmobiling, bicycling, and equestrian uses in designated corridors.

The Department of Fish and Wildlife shall manage the WMWMA so as to retain road access to within two statute miles of any point within the WMWMA.

The Department of Fish and Wildlife shall manage the WMWMA both for natural resource protection and wildlife, including active management to support both game and non-game species.

The Department of Fish and Wildlife shall actively monitor the health, size, and distribution of selected populations of game and non-game species found in the WMWMA. Concurrently, the Department of Fish and Wildlife and the Department of Forests, Parks
and Recreation shall monitor forest conditions of critical habitats including the habitat composition, condition, and health of bear-scarred beech stands, black bear wetland feeding areas, vernal pools, and white-tailed deer wintering
habitat. These departments shall report their findings at the opening of each biennium to the legislative committees on institutions, natural resources and energy, and fish, wildlife and water resources, or any successor committee
or committees.

Prior to the implementation of any changes to the management of WMWMA, and prior to the adoption of any new management plan for the WMWMA, the Department of Fish and Wildlife shall report to the legislative committees on institutions, natural resources
and energy, and fish, wildlife, and water resources, or any successor committee or committees, with regard to those changes and those new plans.

From the date of the execution of this Executive Order, if the Department of Fish and Wildlife intends to change or alter any present traditional recreational use of the WMWMA land or to amend or modify the management plan on the WMWMA, the Department
shall inform the legislative committees on institutions, natural resources and energy, and fish, wildlife, and water resources, or any successor committee or committees, of that intent in writing and through personal testimony,
if invited by said committees to so testify, by the end of the month of January in any year in which the Department intends to institute changes or alter any present use. An emergency situation of a non-recurring nature necessitating
Department action is exempt from the provisions of this paragraph, but information about the emergency action taken must be included in the next year’s report to the legislative committees listed above. At the time of the emergency,
the Commissioner will notify the chairs of the committees referenced above regarding the nature of the emergency and the steps taken to address the emergency.

By this order a Citizen Oversight Council is created to assist in implementing the provisions of this order and the provisions of the Champion land transaction in the northeastern region of Vermont as authorized by the 1999 session of the general assembly.
The council shall function as a forum to hear and attempt to resolve concerns involving the so-called Champion lands that are brought to the attention of the council regarding ongoing use and management of state lands, collaboration
with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, and public access to the public and privately held lands. With respect to the public lands and the role of the Agency of Natural Resources (ANR) and its constituent departments,
these matters may include: public access; the recreation access plan; snowmobiling and other motorized, mechanical, and equestrian access; private roads; temporary restrictions; federal ownership; timber harvesting; wildlife management;
land conservation; water classification; and economic development. The council has no authority to discuss or comment on interests obtained by a private owner who purchases a portion of the property, including timber harvesting
and forest management interests obtained. This Council shall consist of the same membership and incorporates the same duties as the Champion Land Transaction Citizen Advisory Council created by

10 V.S.A. §§ 6407-6409
. In addition, the Citizen Oversight Council shall:

Function as a source of information to persons interested in learning about the transaction including its legal conditions, or about the ongoing use and management of the land, and to provide for citizen advice, input and information relating to the future
of the so-called Champion lands.

Make recommendations to the ANR and its constituent departments and to the legislative committees referenced above on the ongoing process of ensuring that the lands commonly referred to as the Champion lands are: conserved as a working forest for the
sustainable production of wood products; conserved for natural resources, including the maintenance of wildlife habitat and the conservation of identified natural heritage sites; and conserved for perpetual public access for traditional
recreational uses.

The ANR and its constituent departments shall involve the council in their deliberative processes as they relate to the management of the WMWMA, and shall give due special consideration to any council recommendation provided under this section.

The Department of Fish and Wildlife shall provide administrative and staff support to the council. Citizen council members shall be entitled to compensation as provided under

32 V.S.A. § 1010
, for no more than three meetings during a year in which the council is authorized, under this section, to meet.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated November 1, 2002.

Executive Order No. 10-30
(No. 14-03) [Climate Change Action Plan for State Government Buildings and Operations.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 10-40 (codified as Executive Order No. 15-12), dated December 28, 2012.

Executive Order No. 10-31
(No. 02-04) [Vermont Clean State Program.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-50 (codified as Executive Order 10-09), dated December 23, 2009.

Executive Order No. 10-32
(No. 03-04) [Vermont Advisory Commission on Manufactured and Mobile Homes.

Expired by its own terms, effective December 31, 2005.

Executive Order No. 10-33
(No. 07-05) [Governor’s Commission on Climate Change.

Expired by its own terms, effective October 26, 2009.

Executive Order No. 10-34
(No. 03-07) [Vermont Environmental Engineering Advisory Council.

Expired by its own terms, effective June 30, 2010.

Executive Order No. 10-35
(No. 06-07) [Governor’s Commission on the Future of State Parks.

Expired by its own terms, effective December 2008

Executive Order No. 10-36
(No. 02-10) [Enhancing Investments in Affordable Housing.

WHEREAS, a Tiger Team comprised of a skilled group of state employees with solid financial and analytical skills was formed to profile and review key financial data of Vermont’s affordable housing delivery system and to suggest and explore opportunities
to enhance the efficiency of the system; and

WHEREAS, five statewide entities serving state government, including the Vermont Housing Finance Agency (“VHFA”), the Vermont State Housing Authority (“VSHA”), the Housing Foundation, Inc. (“HFI”), the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board (“VHCB”),
and the Department of Economic, Housing, and Community Development (“DEHCD”), and at least twelve non-profit housing organizations, have as their primary purpose the common mission of serving the affordable housing community; and

WHEREAS, the five statewide entities employ over 130 employees, including three executive directors, a commissioner, and supporting staff, and consist of four separate Boards with 37 individual board members; and

WHEREAS, the five statewide entities often collaborate to provide funding to the same affordable housing projects, especially through Vermont’s non-profit affordable housing network; and

WHEREAS, the five statewide entities’ net assets are largely comprised of loan receivables held by VHFA and VHCB; and

WHEREAS, the viability of Vermont’s affordable housing delivery system is dependent upon preserving the economic value of receivables created by investments of Vermont taxpayers and maximizing the direct benefit of these investments to Vermonters seeking
affordable housing; and

WHEREAS, the Tiger Team observed that the current design and implementation of the state’s affordable housing delivery system may foster a level of undue complexity and duplication of efforts, resulting in greater administrative costs and less direct
investment in the construction and maintenance of affordable housing; and

WHEREAS, the Tiger Team observed that operating and personnel expenditures for non-profit housing organizations has increased substantially greater than the rate of inflation for the period 2005-2008; and

WHEREAS, the Tiger Team observed that changes to housing policy may result in increased revenue that could be used for investment in more affordable housing; and

WHEREAS, the Tiger Team’s review concluded that a 10% savings in administrative costs within the five statewide entities alone would result in approximately $900,000 annually in direct investment in affordable housing, which could generate $20 million
or more in additional investments in affordable housing if leveraged over a 30 year term and preserve the financial value of past capital investments in affordable housing; and

WHEREAS, further review of the state entities’ affordable housing delivery system is warranted given the substantial resources currently dedicated to funding that system and the potential for savings and efficiencies.

NOW, THEREFORE, I, James H. Douglas, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby direct the Commissioner of the Department of Economic, Housing, and Community Development to convene the necessary resources and stakeholders, as he shall
deem necessary, to explore the redesign of, and business process improvements to, the state affordable housing delivery system to achieve savings and efficiencies which shall be used to make additional direct investment in affordable
housing.

The Commissioner shall, in consultation and conjunction with VHFA, VSHA, HFI, VHCB, and DEHCD:

Conduct an in-depth review of the existing organizational structures and business processes of the five state affordable housing entities and make recommendations to improve their effectiveness and increase efficiencies;

Recommend and procedures to ensure loan receivables held by the state affordable housing entities are managed in a fiduciary-oriented manner to ensure these substantial assets are available as a current and future resource for additional investments in
affordable housing; and

Provide a written report to the Governor and to the General Assembly no later than September 1, 2010 containing all findings and recommendations to achieve the purposes of this Executive Order.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution and shall expire upon delivery of the written report to the Governor and the General Assembly.

Dated March 18, 2010.

Executive Order No. 10-37
(No. 01-11) [Council on Energy and the Environment.

WHEREAS, the State of Vermont must come to terms with the implications of climate change and limited fossil fuels; and

WHEREAS, the Governor recognizes the need and opportunity to promote a renewable energy economy that protects our natural environment, provides energy security, and creates sustainable jobs; and

WHEREAS, the Governor desires the counsel of private citizens knowledgeable about the natural environment of Vermont, renewable energy, and the opportunities to reduce our contribution to climate change by conserving and increasing efficiencies across
all sectors, including heating, electric and transportation;

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Peter Shumlin, by the virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby establish the Governor’s Council on Energy and the Environment solely to advise the Governor of policy issues affecting the natural environment and energy
security of the State of Vermont. To these ends, I direct the following:

The Governor’s Council on Energy and the Environment will consist of up to 25 members, all of whom shall be appointed by the Governor and serve at his pleasure.

The Council shall meet with the Governor at least four times annually.

The Governor shall annually appoint one member to the council to serve as Chair.

The Executive Office of the Governor shall provide administrative support to the Council. Members of the Council shall receive no compensation for their service.

This executive order shall take effect upon signing and shall rescind Executive Order No. 5-92.

Dated March 30, 2011.

Executive Order No. 10-38
(No. 05-11) [Governor’s Climate Cabinet.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 10-40 (codified as Executive Order No. 15-12), dated December 28, 2012.

Executive Order No. 10-39
(No. 06-12) [Interagency Green Infrastructure Council.

Expired by its own terms, effective January 1, 2017.

Executive Order No. 10-40
(No. 15-12) [Governor’s Climate Cabinet and State Agency Climate Action Plan.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 10-42 (codified as Executive Order No. 12-17), dated July 20, 2017.

Executive Order No. 10-41
(No. 11-17) [Vermont Outdoor Recreation Economic Collaborative.

WHEREAS, Vermont’s landscape of forests, farms and human communities and their associated outdoor recreation opportunities are major reasons why people visit and live in Vermont; and

WHEREAS, in Vermont, outdoor recreation accounts for 34,000 direct jobs and $2.5 billion in consumer spending; and

WHEREAS, our natural, cultural and physical recreation assets can and should be leveraged to sustain, grow and drive economic development in all sectors of Vermont’s economy with particular attention to the segment that includes outdoor recreation industry
businesses that are most closely aligned with the State’s outdoor recreation brand; and

WHEREAS, those recreation assets must be wisely managed and strengthened, not only to grow the economic development potential of this sector, but to sustain and enhance the value of the Vermont brand, the experience of visitors to Vermont and Vermonters’
quality of life;

WHEREAS, there exists a broad set of outdoor recreation stakeholders but no platform for collective focus for accomplishing major efforts in this regard; and

WHEREAS, it is important to establish a mechanism to identify and engage outdoor recreation businesses and other stakeholders to create a Vermont Outdoor Recreation Economic Collaborative (“VOREC”) for purposes promoting prudent stewardship of State recreation
assets and marketing the outdoor recreation values and attributes of Vermont to effectively foster economic growth.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED that I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby create the VOREC Steering Committee (“VOREC Committee”), as follows:

Composition and Appointments.

The VOREC Committee shall be comprised of no more than fifteen members to be appointed by the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation from inside and outside of government in consultation with the Secretary of the Agency of Commerce and Community
Development (“ACCD”), with the approval of the Governor. The State members shall include the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation or designee who shall serve as Chair and the Secretary of ACCD or designee. Non-State
members shall include five representatives from companies within Vermont’s outdoor recreation industry, one representative from a Vermont nonprofit conservation organization, two representatives from the Vermont Trails and
Greenways Council, one representing motorized recreation and one representing non-motorized recreation, three representatives from other Vermont nonprofit recreation organizations and two at-large members with experience in
other Vermont economic development initiatives and/or outdoor recreation planning.

The VOREC Committee may, in its discretion, establish working groups to support its mission, drawing membership from any agency or department of State government or private/non-profit entity. The VOREC Committee may, at its discretion, engage with private
sector professionals in order to develop and implement the goals of this Executive Order.

The VOREC Committee shall receive administrative and staff support from the Department of Forests, Parks, and Recreation and ACCD.

VOREC Charge and Process.

The VOREC Committee shall be advisory to the Governor. The VOREC Committee shall meet at the call of the Chair. The VOREC Committee shall adopt bylaws for governance of its meetings and engagement of the greater Collaborative before July 1, 2017. The
VOREC Committee shall identify and engage a broad set of outdoor recreation businesses and other stakeholders for purposes of creating the VOREC. The VOREC Committee shall develop a strategy and specific action plan with measurable
outcomes to, at a minimum, address the following:

• Contribute to efforts to market the outdoor recreation values and attributes of Vermont to effectively foster economic growth;

• Examine and promote laws, policies and initiatives that encourage outdoor recreation business;

• Strengthen stewardship of outdoor recreation resources and the organizations that support them;

• Mobilize the members of the VOREC to develop and implement the initiatives of the VOREC Committee; and

• Encourage, incentivize and guide the development of community-oriented outdoor recreation assets increasing economic impacts.

VOREC will report all findings and recommendations to the Governor on or before September 15 of each year, beginning September 15, 2017. VOREC will advise the Governor on the effectiveness of this Order on the development and implementation of VOREC initiatives.

Effective Date.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated June 15, 2017.